Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
PART 3 Dimension Lumber

Administrative rules and regulations.

Grading standards, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Treated Timber and Treated Timber Products, Subject 40-22-9.

2-14-120.
“Dimension lumber” defined; adoption of standards for grading of dimension lumber.

As used in this part, the term “dimension lumber” means lumber that is at least two inches (nominal) thick and up to but not including five inches (nominal) thick and two inches or more in width.

The Commissioner shall require with respect to the grading of dimension lumber that standards shall be in conformity with those which are currently adopted by the American Lumber Standards Committee under the auspices of the United States Department of Commerce.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 338, § 1.

2-14-121.
Graded dimension lumber to be stamped by licensed agency.

On and after July 1, 1990, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to offer for sale in this state any dimension lumber stamped according to grade unless it has been stamped by a grading agency licensed by the American Lumber Standards Committee under the auspices of the United States Department of Commerce.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 338, § 1.

2-14-122.
Enforcement by Commissioner; stop sale, stop use, and removal orders; seizure of lumber.

In order to carry out this part, the Commissioner or his designated agent may enter into or upon any place during reasonable business hours where dimension lumber is being sold or offered for sale to determine if this part is being complied with.

The Commissioner may issue and enforce written or printed stop sale, stop use, or removal orders to the owners or custodians of any dimension lumber, ordering them to hold the same at a designated place, when the Commissioner finds such dimension lumber being offered for sale in violation of this part, until the law has been complied with and such dimension lumber has been released, in writing, by the Commissioner or the violations have been otherwise legally disposed of by written authority. The Commissioner shall release the dimension lumber when the requirements of this part have been complied with.

Any dimension lumber not in compliance with this part shall be subject to seizure on the complaint of the Commissioner to the superior court of the county in which the dimension lumber is found. If the court finds the dimension lumber to be in violation of this part and orders its condemnation, the dimension lumber shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with its quality, the interests of the parties, and the laws of this state, provided that in no instance shall the disposition of the dimension lumber be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the dimension lumber in such manner as to bring it into compliance with this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-122

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 338, § 1.

2-14-123.
Violations.

Any person violating any provisions of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-123

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 338, § 1.